Arkansas, session 2025, HB1782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 56, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-56-101. Prohibition on over-the-counter diet pills to a person
under eighteen years of age.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Over-the-counter diet pills” means a class of drugs that
is labeled and marketed under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21
U.S.C. § 301 et seq., as existing on January 1, 2025, for the purpose of
achieving weight loss that is lawfully sold, transferred, or otherwise
furnished without a prescription.
(B) “Over-the-counter diet pills” includes a product
marketed with a drug facts panel under federal regulations that contains
either approved drug ingredients or ingredients deemed adulterated under 21
*JMB533*
03-19-2025 14:38:41 JMB533

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1782
U.S.C. § 342, as existing on January 1, 2025, or both; and
(2) “Retail establishment” means a vendor that:
(A) In the regular course of business, sells over-the-
counter diet pills at retail directly to the public, including without
limitation a pharmacy, grocery store, other retail store; or
(B) Accept orders placed by mail, telephone, electronic
mail, internet website, online catalog, or software application.
(b) A retail establishment shall not sell, transfer, or otherwise
furnish over-the-counter diet pills to a person who is under eighteen (18)
years of age.
(c) A retail establishment shall request valid identification from a
person who attempts to purchase over-the-counter diet pills if that person
reasonably appears to the retail establishment to be under eighteen (18)
years of age.
(d) The Department of Health may promulgate rules to implement this
section that may include determinations as to which over-the-counter diet
pills are subject to the requirements of this section.
(e)(1) A violation of this section is a deceptive and unconscionable
trade practice under § 4-88-107 and is subject to the penalties, remedies,
and enforcement provisions under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-
101 et seq.
(2) In addition to the penalties under subdivision (e)(1) of
this section, the department shall impose a fine not to exceed two thousand
dollars ($2,000) upon a retail establishment that violates this section.

/s/Hudson










03-19-2025 14:38:41 JMB533